Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 5. Clean Coal Projects.

§ 10.1-1332.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Center”
means the Virginia Center for Coal and Energy Research.

“Clean coal project”
means any project that uses any technology, including a technology applied at the precombustion, combustion, or postcombustion stage, at a new or existing facility that (i) will achieve significant reductions in air emissions of sulfur dioxide or oxides of nitrogen associated with the utilization of coal in the generation of electricity, process steam, or industrial products and is not in widespread use or (ii) is otherwise defined as clean coal technology pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7651n.

History.

2006, c. 939, § 67-400; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 recodified former

Titles 45.1

and 67 as Title 45.2. As part of the recodification, former § 67-400 was recodified as this section.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 10.1-1333.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Permitting process for clean coal projects.

To the extent authorized by federal law, the Board shall implement permit processes that facilitate the construction of clean coal projects in the Commonwealth by, among such other actions as it deems appropriate, giving priority to processing permit applications for clean coal projects.

History.

2006, c. 939, § 67-401; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 recodified former

Titles 45.1

and 67 as Title 45.2. As part of the recodification, former § 67-401 was recodified as this section.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Board.”

§ 10.1-1333.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Permitting process for clean coal projects.

To the extent authorized by federal law, the Department of Environmental Quality shall implement permit processes that facilitate the construction of clean coal projects in the Commonwealth by, among such other actions as it deems appropriate, giving priority to processing permit applications for clean coal projects.

History.

2006, c. 939, § 67-401; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387; 2022, c. 356.